Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.110

Disposition of proceeds.

The proceeds of sales of county property except in cases of trade-in allowances upon purchases of like property must be paid to the county treasurer who must receipt therefor and execute the proper documents transferring title attested to by the county auditor. In no case shall the title be transferred until the purchase price has been fully paid.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.34.110. Prior: 1945 c 254 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4014-10; prior: (i) 1915 c 8 s 1, part; 1891 c 76 s 5, part; RRS s 4011, part. (ii) 1891 c 76 s 6, part; RRS s 4013, part.]